Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 9A Woman’s Right to Know
31-9A-8.
Severability.

If any one or more provisions, Code sections, subsections, sentences, clauses, phrases, or words of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is found to be unconstitutional, the same is declared to be severable, and the balance of this chapter shall remain effective notwithstanding such unconstitutionality. The General Assembly declares that it would have enacted this chapter and each Code section, subsection, sentence, clause, phrase, or word thereof irrespective of the fact that any one or more provisions, Code sections, subsections, sentences, clauses, phrases, or words would be declared unconstitutional.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-9A-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 1450, § 6/HB 197.